Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1579.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7114 of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 7114. Townships.[(a) Election.--]The following shall apply:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 (1) The qualified voters of every township shall vote for and elect a properly qualified person for constable.(2) The qualified electors of each township of the first class may vote for and elect a properly qualified person to serve as constable, in addition to the constable elected under paragraph (1).[(b) Procedure upon election; penalty.--Every person elected to the office of constable in a township shall appear in court on the first day of the next court of common pleas of the same county to accept or decline the office. A person who neglects or refuses to appear, after having been duly notified of the election, shall forfeit to the township the sum of $40 to be levied by order of the court.(c) Bond.--The bond given by a constable in a township shall be in a sum not less than $500 nor more than $3,000, as the court shall direct, and shall be taken by the clerk of the court in the name of the Commonwealth, with conditions for just and faithful discharge by the constable of the duties of office. The bond shall be held in trust for the use and benefit of persons who may sustain injury by reason of neglect of duty, and for the same purposes and uses as a sheriff's bond.]Section 2. Title 44 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7115. Bond.The bond given by a constable shall be in a commercially available sum not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000, as the court shall direct, and shall be taken by the clerk of the court in the name of the Commonwealth, with conditions for just and faithful discharge by the constable of the duties of office. The bond shall be held in trust for the use and benefit of persons who may sustain injury by reason of neglect of duty, and for the 20250HB1579PN1874 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 same purposes and uses as a sheriff's bond.Section 3. Section 7132 of Title 44 is amended to read:§ 7132. Police officers.[(a) Constable employed as policeman not to accept other fees in addition to salary.--]Except for public rewards and legal mileage allowed to a constable or deputy constable for traveling expenses, [and except as provided in subsection (b), it is unlawful for] a constable or deputy constable who is also employed as a [policeman to] police officer may not charge or accept a fee or other compensation, other than [his] the salary as a [policeman] police officer, for services rendered or performed pertaining to [his] the office or duties as a [policeman or constable.] police officer, constable or deputy constable. Reimbursement for mileage is not payable to a constable or deputy constable for travel within the municipality if the constable or deputy constable is also employed as a police officer.[(b) Exception.--Unless prevented from doing so by the operation of 8 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 Subch. J (relating to civil service for police and fire apparatus operators), borough policemen who reside in the borough may hold and exercise the office of constable in the borough, or in any ward thereof, and receive all costs, fees and emoluments pertaining to such office.]Section 4. Title 44 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 7133. Bail bond enforcement agent.(a) General rule.--(1) Unless separately licensed within this Commonwealth as a bail bond enforcement agent and except as provided in subsection (b), a constable or deputy constable may not 20250HB1579PN1874 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recapture suspects who are released on bail.(2) If separately licensed within this Commonwealth as a bail bond enforcement agent, a constable or deputy constable recapturing suspects released on bail shall comply with all statutes and regulations governing bail bond enforcement agents.(b) Exception.--Regardless of licensure as a bail bond enforcement agent, a constable or deputy constable may execute a warrant of arrest issued for an individual released on bail.§ 7134. Professional bondsman.A constable or deputy constable may not engage in or continue to engage in business as a professional bondsman.§ 7135. Debt collection.(a) Debt collector.--Except when engaged under judicial or other civil process, a constable or deputy constable may not enforce, collect, settle, adjust or compromise claims on behalf of a creditor or collection agency.(b) Collector-repossessor.--(1) Unless regularly employed by an installment seller or sales finance company, a constable or deputy constable may not collect a payment on an installment sale contract or repossess a motor vehicle that is the subject of an installment sale contract.(2) When collecting a payment or repossessing a motor vehicle as regularly employed individuals, constables and deputy constables may not hold themselves out to be constables and deputy constables.(3) A constable or deputy constable who is authorized as a regularly employed individual to collect a payment or repossess a motor vehicle may not independently contract to 20250HB1579PN1874 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 perform the same or similar services as a constable or deputy constable.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Claim." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 7311(h) (relating to unlawful collection agency practices)."Collection agency." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 7311(h)."Creditor." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 7311(h)."Installment sale contract." As defined in 12 Pa.C.S. § 6202 (relating to definitions)."Installment seller." As defined in 12 Pa.C.S. § 6202."Motor vehicle." As defined in 12 Pa.C.S. § 6202."Sales finance company." As defined in 12 Pa.C.S. § 6202.§ 7136. Other incompatible employment.A constable or deputy constable may not accept employment or continue to remain employed in any of the following capacities:(1) A railroad or street railway police officer appointed under 22 Pa.C.S. § 3301 (relating to appointment).(2) A private detective as defined by section 2(c) of The Private Detective Act of 1953.§ 7137. Disqualification.(a) Ineligibility.--An individual is ineligible to serve as a constable or deputy constable if the individual:(1) was convicted of an offense graded as a felony;(2) was convicted of an offense that requires the individual to register under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders);(3) was convicted of an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 20250HB1579PN1874 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to theft and related offenses), if graded as a misdemeanor of the second degree or higher; or(4) was convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol or controlled substance as provided in 75 Pa.C.S. § 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) on two or more occasions within a 10-year period.(b) Certification.--The Constables' Education and Training Board may not certify a constable or deputy constable under section 7144(9) (relating to program established) who is disqualified under subsection (a). To comply with this section, the Constables' Education and Training Board shall check criminal history record information under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).§ 7138. Nepotism.(a) Magisterial district judge.--A magisterial district judge may not request services from and may not assign work to a constable or deputy constable who is a family member or household member of the magisterial district judge or of a staff member of the magisterial district judge.(b) Constable or deputy constable.--A constable or deputy constable may not perform work for or accept an assignment from a magisterial district judge if the constable or deputy constable is a family member or household member of the magisterial district judge or of a staff member of the magisterial district judge.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Family member or household member." A spouse, parent, 20250HB1579PN1874 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, cousin, grandparent, grandchild or member of the same household.Section 5. Sections 7142(b) and (c), 7144(12), 7145, 7149(a) and (b) and 7151 of Title 44 are amended to read:§ 7142. Conduct and insurance.* * *(b) Liability insurance.--Every constable and deputy constable must file with the clerk of courts proof that he has, currently in force, a policy of professional liability insurance covering each individual in the performance of [his judicial] duties with a minimum coverage of [$250,000] $500,000 per incident and a minimum aggregate of [$500,000] $750,000 per year. The Constables' Education and Training Board shall [immediately] recurrently investigate and implement the most cost-effective method of achieving liability insurance for constables and deputy constables under this subsection.(c) Loss of certification.--Any constable or deputy constable who fails, neglects or refuses to maintain a current insurance policy as required by subsection (b) or to file proof thereof with the clerk of courts shall cease automatically to be certified to perform [judicial] duties upon the expiration of the policy of which proof has been filed with the clerk of courts. A fee earned prior to loss of certification remains payable to the constable or deputy constable.* * *§ 7144. Program established.The board, with the review and approval of the commission, shall:* * *(12) Make an annual report to the Governor and to the 20250HB1579PN1874 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Assembly concerning:(i) The administration of the Constables' Education and Training Program.(ii) The activities of the board.(iii) The costs of the program.(iv) Proposed changes, if any, in this subchapter.(v) The availability of insurance.§ 7145. Program contents.[The Constables' Education and Training Program shall include training for a total of 80 hours, the content of which shall be determined by regulation. The training shall include instruction in the interpretation and application of the fees provided for in section 7161 (relating to fees).](a) Hours and content generally.--The Constables' Education and Training Program shall include a minimum of 80 hours to a maximum of 120 hours of training for newly elected constables and deputy constables. Except as provided in subsection (b), the training content shall be determined by regulation.(b) Subjects.-- The training under this section shall include instruction in the following subjects:(1) The interpretation and application of the fees provided for in section 7161 (relating to fees).(2) The rules and regulations governing the proper use of an emergency vehicle, as that term is defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(3) Constable arrest powers.(4) The use of force in law enforcement.(5) First aid training, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation education.(6) Control tactics, including:20250HB1579PN1874 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The mechanics of arrest, restraint and control.(ii) Less lethal weapon familiarization.(iii) The transport of detainees.(iv) In-custody risks.(c) Completion.--(1) A constable or deputy constable shall have two years to complete training under this section.(2) A constable or deputy constable who fails to meet the training requirements established under this section shall be ineligible to receive any salary, compensation or other consideration or thing of value for the performance of duties as a constable or deputy constable.(d) Reduction of hours.--The Constables' Education and Training Program may reduce the hours of education and training required in this section if the constable or deputy constable, because of prior education, training or experience, has acquired knowledge or skill equivalent to that provided by the program.§ 7149. Restricted account.(a) Account established.--There is established a special restricted account within the General Fund, which shall be known as the Constables' Education and Training Account, for the purposes of financing training program expenses, the costs of administering the program and all other costs associated with the activities of the board and the implementation of this subchapter and as provided under subsection (f). The Constables' Education and Training Account shall also be used to pay the costs associated with the county constabulary review boards established under section 7179(b) (relating to oversight).(b) Surcharge.--There is assessed as a cost in each case before a magisterial district judge a surcharge of [$5] $10 per 20250HB1579PN1874 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 docket number in each criminal case and [$5] $10 per named defendant in each civil case in which a constable or deputy constable performs a service provided in Subchapter G (relating to compensation), except that no county shall be required to pay this surcharge on behalf of any indigent or other defendant in a criminal case.* * *§ 7151. General imposition of duties and grant of powers.Constables and deputy constables shall perform all duties authorized or imposed on them by statute.Section 6. Title 44 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7151.1. Constabulary badge and uniform.(a) Requirements.--When performing or attempting to perform a duty authorized by this chapter, a constable or deputy constable shall:(1) Wear a police-style uniform or other clothing that clearly and conspicuously identifies the individual as a constable or deputy constable.(2) Carry a constabulary badge.(b) Uniform.--(1) If a constable or deputy constable is wearing clothing that clearly and conspicuously identifies the individual as a constable or deputy constable, the writing on at least one article of the clothing must clearly and conspicuously state "constable" or "deputy constable" and may not exclusively state "police."(2) When a constable or deputy constable is working with and accompanied by a second constable or a deputy, only one individual is required to wear a uniform or other clothing clearly and conspicuously identifying the individual as a 20250HB1579PN1874 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constable or deputy constable.(c) Regulation.--By regulation, the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency may establish standards for uniform or other clothing consistent with this section.(d) Identification card.--Upon the successful completion of the training required under section 7145 (relating to program contents), the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency shall issue a constable or deputy constable an identification card containing the following information:(1) A distinguishing number assigned by the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency to certified constables or deputy constables.(2) The name of the constable or deputy constable.(3) A color photograph or photographic facsimile of the constable or deputy constable.(4) Other information as may be required by the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(e) Clothing.--A constable or deputy constable may not wear a police-style uniform or other clothing that clearly and conspicuously identifies the individual as a constable or deputy constable or display a constabulary badge under this section if the constable or deputy constable is performing duties or services as a security guard employed by a patrol agency as defined by section 2(e) of the act of August 21, 1953 (P.L.1273, No.361), known as The Private Detective Act of 1953.Section 7. Section 7155 of Title 44 is repealed:[§ 7155. Arrest of offenders against forest laws.If a person is detected by a constable in the act of trespassing upon any forest or timber land within this Commonwealth, under circumstances as to warrant reasonable 20250HB1579PN1874 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 suspicion that the person has, is or may commit an offense against any law for the protection of forests and timber land, the constable may, without first procuring a warrant, arrest the person.]Section 8. Sections 7156(b) and 7158 of Title 44 are amended to read:§ 7156. Executions.* * *(b) Invalid returns.--If a constable or deputy constable makes a false return, does not produce the plaintiff's receipt on the return day or makes a return deemed insufficient by the magisterial district judge, the magisterial district judge shall issue a summons to the constable or deputy constable to appear on the designated day, which may not be more than eight days from the date of issuance, to show cause why a writ of execution should not be issued against the constable or deputy constable for the amount of the writ of execution under subsection (a). If the constable or deputy constable does not appear or does not show sufficient cause why the writ of execution should not be issued against [him] the constable or deputy constable, the magisterial district judge shall enter judgment against the constable or deputy constable for the amount of the writ of execution under subsection (a) with costs. No stay may be entered upon the writ of execution, and, upon application of the plaintiff or [his] the plaintiff's agent, the magisterial district judge shall issue an execution against the constable for the amount of the judgment, which may be directed to an authorized person. The summons under this subsection shall be issued to an authorized person to serve. If the summons is not served, that person shall pay a fine of [$20] $25. If an 20250HB1579PN1874 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized person cannot be conveniently found to serve the summons, the magisterial district judge shall direct it to the supervisor of the highways of the township, ward or district where the constable or deputy constable resides, who shall serve the summons or pay a penalty of [$20] $25.* * *§ 7158. [Arrest in boroughs.In addition to any other powers granted under law, a constable of a borough shall, without warrant and upon view, arrest and commit for hearing any person who:(1) Is guilty of a breach of the peace, vagrancy, riotous or disorderly conduct or drunkenness.(2) May be engaged in the commission of any unlawful act tending to imperil the personal security or endanger the property of the citizens.(3) Violates any ordinance of the borough for which a fine or penalty is imposed.] Arrest powers.(a) Authorization.--If probable cause exists, a readily identifiable constable or deputy constable may, without warrant and upon view, arrest and commit for hearing an individual who:(1) engages in conduct prohibited under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct);(2) attempts to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another individual;(3) communicates, either directly or indirectly, a threat to commit a crime of violence with intent to terrorize another individual;(4) recklessly engages in conduct that places or may place another individual in danger of death or serious bodily injury; or20250HB1579PN1874 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) violates an ordinance for which a fine or penalty is imposed.(b) Fee.--A fee is not payable for the effectuation of a warrantless arrest under this section.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bodily injury." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions)."Crime of violence." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses)."Readily identifiable constable or deputy constable." A constable or deputy constable who:(1) is wearing a uniform or other clothing and carrying a badge as required by section 7151.1 (relating to constabulary badge and uniform); and(2) makes a reasonable effort to identify as a constable or deputy constable."Serious bodily injury." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301.Section 9. Section 7161(a), (e), (f), (g) and (h) of Title 44 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7161. Fees.(a) Travel or mileage.--(1) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle shall be reimbursed at a rate equal to the highest rate allowed by the Internal Revenue Service.(2) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle is reimbursable for distances equaling or exceeding one mile.(3) If travel occurs by a mode other than motor vehicle, 20250HB1579PN1874 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reimbursement shall be for the vouchered travel expenses.* * *(e) Payment.--All civil, landlord-tenant and criminal fees shall be paid by the court to the constable or deputy constable as soon as possible and in no case not more than 15 days in civil and landlord-tenant cases and 30 days in criminal cases after the service is performed and a proper request for payment is submitted, provided that, in criminal cases where the books and accounts of the relevant county offices are payable on a monthly basis, payment shall be made not more than 15 days after the close of the month.(f) Civil and landlord-tenant cases.--Fees in civil and landlord-tenant cases shall be as follows:(1) For serving complaint, summons or notice on suitor or tenant, either personally or by leaving a copy, [$13] $20, plus [$5] $10 for each additional defendant at the same address, [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(2) For levying goods, including schedule of property levied upon and set aside, notice of levy and return of service, [$75] $125, plus mileage.(3) For advertising personal property for public sale, [$7] $10 per posting, with a maximum [$21] $30 fee, plus mileage, plus the cost of advertising.(4) For selling goods levied, receipts and returns to court, [$85] $125, plus mileage.(5) For making return of not found, [$13] $20, plus mileage. Payment shall be limited to three returns of not found.(6) For executing order of possession, [$13] $20, plus [$5] $10 for each additional defendant at the same address, 20250HB1579PN1874 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(7) For ejectment, [$90, $2.50] $150, $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(8) For making any return of service other than not found, [$2.50] $5 each.(9) For providing courtroom security as ordered[, $13] by a magisterial district judge, $25 per hour, assessed against one or more parties as determined by the court.(10) (i) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle shall be reimbursed at the rate equal to the highest rate allowed by the Internal Revenue Service.(ii) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle is reimbursable for distances equaling or exceeding one mile.(iii) If travel is by other than motor vehicle, reimbursement shall be for vouchered travel expenses.(g) Criminal cases.--Fees in criminal cases shall be as follows:(1) For executing each warrant of arrest not already executed by a law enforcement agency or for effectuating the payment of fines and costs by attempting to execute each warrant of arrest, [$25] $50 for each docket number and [$2.50] $5 for each return of service, plus mileage.(2) For taking physical custody of a defendant, [$5] $25 per defendant[.], starting when released by a law enforcement agency or jailor to the constable or deputy constable or after the execution of a warrant of arrest and ending with discharge or commitment with the starting and ending times documented.(3) For [conveyance of] physically taking a defendant to 20250HB1579PN1874 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or from court, [$5] $25 per defendant[.], but payable for physically taking a defendant from court when directed to do so and documented by a magisterial district judge. This fee is not payable in addition to the fees for transporting defendants by motor vehicle under paragraphs (9) and (10) during the same trip.(4) For physical attendance at arraignment or hearing, [$13.] $25 as a flat fee, but beginning and ending times must be documented.(5) For executing discharge[, $5] in lieu of arresting a defendant on a warrant when the money was collected to clear the warrant, $25 per defendant.(6) For executing judicial order of commitment[, $5] to jail, $25 per defendant.(7) For executing release[, $5] of custody from the police, a sheriff or a correctional facility to a constable or deputy constable, $25 per defendant.(8) For making timely returns of completed paperwork to the court[, $2.50.] or issuing authority, $5. For nonservice of a criminal or bench warrant, the court may require the constable or deputy constable to execute an affidavit of due diligence documenting the search efforts.(9) Transporting by motor vehicle each nonincarcerated defendant to jail, [$17] $25, plus mileage; transporting by motor vehicle an incarcerated prisoner, [$38] $50 per prisoner, plus an hourly rate of [$13] $25 per hour, plus mileage. Computation of hourly rate will apply after the expiration of the first hour per prisoner per hour, not to exceed [$26] $50 per hour per constable or deputy constable.(10) Receipt of the fees for transporting by motor 20250HB1579PN1874 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vehicle a nonincarcerated defendant under paragraph (9) shall not exclude receipt of the fees under paragraphs (6) and (8) for that transport.(11) Receipt of the fees for transporting by motor vehicle an incarcerated prisoner under paragraph (9) shall exclude receipt of the fees under paragraphs (2), (3), (4) and (7) for the transport.(12) (i) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle shall be reimbursed at the rate equal to the highest rate allowed by the Internal Revenue Service.(ii) Actual mileage for travel by motor vehicle is reimbursable for distances equaling or exceeding one mile.(iii) If travel is by other than motor vehicle, reimbursement shall be for vouchered travel expenses.(13) For [conveying] physically taking defendants for fingerprinting[, $17] at a location other than jail, $25 per defendant as ordered by the magisterial district judge per defendant as ordered by the magisterial district judge, plus [$13] $25 per hour while present beyond the first hour per defendant per hour, not to exceed [$26] $50 per hour per constable or deputy constable, plus mileage. Unless the fingerprinting is done at a location other than the jail, this fee is not payable in addition to the fees for transporting defendants by motor vehicle under paragraphs (9) and (10) during the same trip.(14) For holding one or more defendants at the office of a magisterial district judge[, $13] for the time that the constable or deputy constable remains prior to the start of the hearing and the time after the conclusion of the hearing 20250HB1579PN1874 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 but prior to release or transport, $25 per hour per defendant beyond the first half hour.(15) For courtroom security as ordered[, $13] by a magisterial district judge, $25 per hour, assessed against one or more parties as determined by the court.(16) In all criminal cases wherein the defendant is discharged or indigent or the case is otherwise dismissed, the court shall assess to the county the fee provided in this section, except that, in cases of private criminal complaints where the defendant is discharged prior to the indictment or the filing of any information or the case is otherwise dismissed at the summary offense hearing, the court [shall assess the fee to the affiant.] may assess the fee to the affiant, except in cases of domestic violence wherein the fee shall be assessed to the county.(17) The fees for physically taking a defendant under paragraphs (3) and (13) are payable whether the defendant is taken by motor vehicle or otherwise, but the fees for transporting a defendant by motor under paragraphs (9), (10) and (11) are not payable if the defendant is not transported accordingly.(h) Subpoenas.--For serving district court-issued subpoenas for civil, landlord-tenant or criminal matters, [$13] $15 for first witness, plus [$5] $6 for each additional witness at the same address, [$2.50] $3 return of service for each subpoena, plus mileage. The same fee shall be payable for attempting to serve a subpoena at a wrong address supplied by the party requesting the service. The fees for witnesses and return of service under this subsection accrue per docket number.* * *20250HB1579PN1874 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (j) Nepotism.--A fee under this subchapter is not payable if the claim for payment arose under the circumstances prohibited in section 7138 (relating to nepotism).Section 10. Section 7161.1(a) and (b) of Title 44 are amended to read:§ 7161.1. Specific fees.(a) Court appearances and returns.--For attendance on court and making returns, the fees to be received by constables shall be [$2.50] $2.75 per day.(b) Notices of election.--For serving notices of their election upon township or borough officers, the fees to be received by constables or deputy constables shall be [$0.15] $0.20 for each service.* * *Section 11. Section 7164 of Title 44 is repealed:[§ 7164. Impounding, selling and viewing fees.(a) Impounding and selling.--The fees collected by the constable for impounding an animal shall be $1 and $2 for each animal sold, provided that the fees of the constable for impounding and selling amount to not more than $4. The fees of the magisterial district judge shall be $1 for each case, without regard to the number of animals impounded, for all cases where no sale is made and $3 for all cases where a sale is made.(b) Viewing.--The fees for each viewer appointed to assess the damages shall be $1 for the first hour and $.50 per hour for each hour necessarily engaged after the first hour.]Section 12. Sections 7165, 7171(b) and (c), 7172 and 7176 of Title 44 are amended to read:§ 7165. Seizure fees.(a) Registration plates and cards.--If constables and deputy 20250HB1579PN1874 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constables are delegated authority to seize registration plates and registration cards under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1376(b)(5) (relating to surrender of registration plates and cards upon suspension or revocation), they shall be compensated by the department at the rate of [$15] $17 for each registration plate and card jointly seized, plus mileage. The department shall pay a constable or deputy constable within 30 days after a documented request for payment is submitted to it.(b) Drivers' licenses.--If constables and deputy constables are delegated authority to seize drivers' licenses under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1540(c)(1)(v) (relating to surrender of license), they shall be compensated by the department at the rate of [$15] $17 for each driver's license seized, plus mileage. The department shall pay a constable or deputy constable within 30 days after a documented request is submitted to it.§ 7171. Election notice in certain areas.* * *(b) Acting constables.--The acting constable shall, within six days after the election for a constable, give notice in writing to the elected individual of election to the office. An acting constable who violates this subsection shall pay a civil penalty of [$16] $17 to the Commonwealth.(c) Elected constables.--An individual elected and notified under subsection (b) shall appear on the next day that the court of common pleas of the applicable judicial district is in session and either decline or accept the office. A constable elect who violates this subsection shall pay a civil penalty of [$16] $17 to the Commonwealth.* * *§ 7172. Incompetence and removal.20250HB1579PN1874 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Inquiry.--A court of common pleas with competent jurisdiction may inquire into the official conduct of the constable or deputy constable if any of the following apply:(1) A surety of the constable files a verified petition alleging that the constable or deputy constable is incompetent to discharge official duties because of intemperance or neglect of duty.(2) Any person files a verified petition alleging that the constable [is] or deputy constable is malfeasant, engages i n conduct or employment prohibited by Subchapter D (relating to conflicts) or is incompetent to discharge official duties for a reason other than intemperance or neglect of duty. This paragraph includes an act of oppression of a litigant or a witness.(b) Determination.--If the court determines that the constable or deputy constable is malfeasant, has engaged in conduct or employment prohibited by Subchapter D (relating to conflicts) or is incompetent to discharge official duties, the following apply:(1) The court may:(i) require additional security from the constable; or(ii) remove the constable or deputy constable from office.(2) Upon removal under paragraph (1)(ii), the court may appoint a suitable individual to fill the vacancy until a successor is elected and qualified. The appointed individual must have a freehold estate with at least $1,000 beyond incumbrance or furnish security.(c) Deputy constable.--A constable may revoke the 20250HB1579PN1874 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointment of a deputy constable with or without court approval.§ 7176. Compensation violation.A constable who violates [the act of July 14, 1897 (P.L.206, No.209), entitled "An act to regulate the remuneration of policemen and constables employed as policemen throughout the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, and prohibiting them from charging or accepting any fee or other compensation, in addition to their salary, except as public rewards and mileage for traveling expenses,"] section 7132 (relating to police officers) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$50] $1,000 or to imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.Section 13. Section 7178 of Title 44 is repealed:[§ 7178. Failure to serve in a township.(a) Scope of section.--This section applies to an individual in a township if all of the following circumstances exist:(1) The individual is elected or appointed a constable.(2) The individual has a freehold estate worth at least $1,000.(3) The individual fails to:(i) serve; or(ii) appoint a deputy to serve.(b) Fine.--Except as set forth in subsection (c), an individual under subsection (a) shall be fined $40 for the use of the appropriate township.(c) Exception.--Subsection (b) shall not apply to an individual who:(1) has served personally or by deputy in the office of constable of the same township within 15 years of election or 20250HB1579PN1874 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointment; or(2) has paid a fine under subsection (b) within 15 years of election or appointment.]Section 14. Title 44 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7179. Oversight.(a) County constabulary review board.--The county commissioners or the president judge of a county, as provided under subsection (c), shall create a county constabulary review board to:(1) Assist in resolving disputes involving constables or deputy constables and their performance of duties or payment for that performance.(2) Establish uniform policies, procedures and standards affecting constabulary service and payment for those services. The county constabulary review board may adopt or promulgate a constabulary handbook to do so.(3) Comply with and implement any statute, regulation, rule of court, judicial ruling or ruling from the county constabulary review board affecting constabulary service.(b) Membership.--Membership of a county constabulary review board shall include:(1) The following, who shall be appointed by the president judge of the county:(i) One common pleas judge or one magisterial district judge.(ii) One district court or special court administrator.(2) The county controller or a designee of the county controller.(3) The district attorney or a designee of the district 20250HB1579PN1874 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attorney.(4) Two certified constables appointed by the district attorney.(c) Failure to act.--If the county commissioners of a county do not create a county constabulary review board within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the president judge of the county shall create a county constabulary review board to perform the duties authorized by this section.(d) Appeal.--Commonwealth Court shall have jurisdiction to hear any appeal or final order entered in any matter considered by a county constabulary review board.Section 15. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1579PN1874 - 25 - 123456789101112